Utah statutes.
70A-9a-332.    Transfer of money -- Transfer of funds from deposit account.

(1)  A transferee of money takes the money free of a security interest unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.

(2)  A transferee of funds from a deposit account takes the funds free of a security interest in the deposit account unless the transferee acts in collusion with the debtor in violating the rights of the secured party.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

